Maryland, session 2025, SB0882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–701.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “Overburdened community” means any census tract for which three or
more of the following environmental health indicators are above the 75th percentile
statewide:
(i) Particulate matter (PM) 2.5;
(ii) Ozone;
(iii) National Air Toxics Assessment (NATA) diesel PM;
(iv) NATA cancer risk;
(v) NATA respiratory hazard index;
(vi) Traffic proximity;
(vii) Lead paint indicator;
(viii) National Priorities List Superfund site proximity;
(ix) Risk Management Plan facility proximity;
(x) Hazardous waste proximity;
(xi) Wastewater discharge indicator;
(xii) Proximity to a Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO);
(xiii) Percent of the population lacking broadband coverage;

SENATE BILL 882 3
(xiv) Asthma emergency room discharges;
(xv) Myocardial infarction discharges;
(xvi) Low–birth–weight infants;
(xvii) Proximity to emitting power plants;
(xviii) Proximity to a Toxic Release Inventory (TRI) facility;
(xix) Proximity to a brownfields site;
(xx) Proximity to mining operations; and
(xxi) Proximity to a hazardous waste landfill.
(8) “Underserved community” means any census tract in which, according
to the most recent U.S. Census Bureau Survey:
(i) At least 25% of the residents qualify as low–income;
(ii) At least 50% of the residents identify as nonwhite; or
(iii) At least 15% of the residents have limited English proficiency.
SUBTITLE 7. COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE AND FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION FUND.
7–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CARRIER” MEANS A PERSON THAT TRANSPORTS COAL IN THE STATE.
(C) “COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE” MEANS THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER §
7–702 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–702.
(A) (1) THERE IS A COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE IMPOSED ON A CARRIER
FOR THE PRIVILEGE OF TRANSPORTING COAL IN THE STATE.
(2) THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE IS IMPOSED ON THE FIRST
CARRIER TO TRANSPORT COAL IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 882
(B) THE RATE OF THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE IS EQUAL TO $13 PER
SHORT TON OF COAL TRANSPORTED IN THE STATE.
(C) THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE DOES NOT APPLY TO THE
TRANSPORTATION OF COAL THAT IS SOLELY FOR USE ON A FARM AND THE CARRIER
DOES NOT OTHERWISE USE, MANUFACTURE, PACKAGE FOR SALE, OR SELL THE COAL
IN THE STATE.
(D) A CARRIER SHALL PAY THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE TO THE
DEPARTMENT AND PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE
TO THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE TO THE FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–703 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO PROVIDE FOR
THE ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION OF THE COAL TRANSPORTATION FEE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH AUDIT PROCEDURES FOR THE
CARRIERS OF COAL.
7–703.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT ACTIVITIES THAT REDUCE
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM FOSSIL FUELS AND THEIR IMPACTS IN THE
STATE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:

SENATE BILL 882 5
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 7–702 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) (I) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY BY THE DEPARTMENT OR
THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–806 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE TO SUPPORT ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS THAT
REDUCE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS IN THE STATE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE UP TO 9% OF THE AMOUNT
DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND EACH FISCAL YEAR FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
RELATED TO THE ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE ANY REMAINING FUNDS FOR
AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS AS FOLLOWS:
1. UP TO 23% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO INCREASING HOME ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND ELECTRIFICATION;
2. UP TO 23% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS IN COMMERCIAL, MULTIFAMILY, AND
INSTITUTIONAL BUILDINGS;
3. UP TO 22% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS THROUGH THE USE OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLES, ELECTRIC SCHOOL BUSES, AND ELECTRIC CHARGING EQUIPMENT;
4. UP TO 20% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO INCREASING MASS TRANSIT;
5. UP TO 9% FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF ACTIVITIES
AND PROGRAMS;
6. UP TO 2% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO ASTHMA TREATMENT FOR COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY COAL DUST; AND

SENATE BILL 882
7. UP TO 1% FOR ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED
TO PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGNS FOR REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(2) IN EACH FISCAL YEAR, AT LEAST 40% OF THE FUNDING USED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE USED FOR ACTIVITIES
AND PROGRAMS THAT ADDRESS THE NEGATIVE IMPACTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE IN
OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES, AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER MAY USE ANY REMAINING FUNDS NOT USED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ISSUE LOW–INTEREST BONDS FOR
AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS RELATED TO:
1. INCREASING HOME ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND
ELECTRIFICATION;
2. REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS IN
COMMERCIAL, MULTIFAMILY, AND INSTITUTIONAL BUILDINGS;
3. REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS THROUGH
THE USE OF ELECTRIC VEHICLES, ELECTRIC SCHOOL BUSES, AND ELECTRIC
CHARGING EQUIPMENT; AND
4. INCREASING MASS TRANSIT.
(II) THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER MAY USE UP TO
50% OF THE AMOUNT DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND TO ISSUE LOW–INTEREST BONDS
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR ISSUING
LOW–INTEREST BONDS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE
PLACE OF FUNDING THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED FOR ACTIVITIES
SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.

SENATE BILL 882 7
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION AND
REMEDIATION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF
FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR FOSSIL FUEL
MITIGATION AND REMEDIATION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE FOSSIL FUEL MITIGATION FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.